Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1469
Rental deposit, defined.

Rental deposit shall mean a deposit of money to secure performance of a mobile home space rental agreement other than a deposit which is exclusively an advance payment of rent.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 20.